Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB824.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306 of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 306. Community recreation and heritage conservation.* * *(a.1) Grant priority.--In considering applications for grants under this act specifically related to playgrounds, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 playground equipment and associated recreation areas , the department shall give priority to projects that correct accessibility deficiencies for individuals with a disability, including accessible playground equipment, such as ramped, ground-level play features, accessible swings, wheelchair accessible tables, adjustable equipment, universally accessible swings, transfer platforms, sensory play equipment and adaptations for blind and visually impaired individuals. The department shall prioritize projects that create a recreation area universally designed to meet the needs of all individuals and where all equipment, and the recreation area itself, is accessible for individuals with a disability over projects that would create a recreation area where only some equipment, or only the recreation area itself, is accessible for individuals with a disability.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0824PN0851 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617